Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1842.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 122A.181, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Term of license and renewal. (a) The Professional Educator Licensing and Standards Board must issue an initial Tier 1 license for a term of one year. A Tier 1 license may be renewed subject to paragraphs (b) and (c). (b) The Professional Educator Licensing and Standards Board must renew a Tier 1 license if: (1) the district or charter school requesting the renewal demonstrates that it has posted the teacher position but was unable to hire an acceptable teacher with a Tier 2, 3, or 4 license for the position; (2) the teacher holding the Tier 1 license took a content examination in accordance with section 122A.185 and submitted the examination results to the teacher's employing district or charter school within one year of the board approving the request for the initial Tier 1 license; (3) the teacher holding the Tier 1 license participated in cultural competency training consistent with section 120B.30, subdivision 8, within one year of the board approving the request for the initial Tier 1 license; deleted text begin anddeleted text end (4) the teacher holding the Tier 1 license met the mental illness training renewal requirement under section 122A.187, subdivision 6deleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ; andnew text end new text begin (5) the teacher holding the Tier 1 license participated in dyslexia training consistent with section 122A.187, subdivision 5a. new text end The requirement in clause (2) does not apply to a teacher that teaches a class in a career and technical education or career pathways course of study. (c) A Tier 1 license must not be renewed more than three times, unless the requesting district or charter school can show good cause for additional renewals. A Tier 1 license issued to teach (1) a class or course in a career and technical education or career pathway course of study, or (2) in a shortage area, as defined in section 122A.06, subdivision 6, may be renewed without limitation. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for all licenses issued on or after July 1, 2027. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 122A.182, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Term of license and renewal. The Professional Educator Licensing and Standards Board must issue an initial Tier 2 license for a term of two years. A Tier 2 license may be renewed three times. Before a Tier 2 license is renewed for the first time, a teacher holding a Tier 2 license must participate in cultural competency training consistent with section 120B.30, subdivision 8, deleted text begin anddeleted text end mental illness training under section 122A.187, subdivision 6new text begin , and dyslexia training under section 122A.187, subdivision 5anew text end . The board must issue rules setting forth the conditions for additional renewals after the initial license has been renewed three times. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for all licenses issued on or after July 1, 2027. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 122A.187, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 5a. new text end new text begin Dyslexia. new text end new text begin (a) The Professional Educator Licensing and Standards Board must adopt rules that require all licensed teachers who are renewing a teaching license under sections 122A.181 to 122A.184 to include in the renewal requirements two hours of professional development training on dyslexia, including the effects of dyslexia on the development of foundational reading skills, effective instructional needs for students with dyslexia, and mental and behavioral health comorbidities for students with dyslexia. Dyslexia training must be developed by the Professional Educator Licensing and Standards Board with input from the dyslexia specialist under section 120B.122. Professional development resources may include free resources available locally or online. All professional development training and resources must be provided at no cost to teachers or districts. new text end new text begin (b) A new teacher must complete dyslexia training under this section within one year of the board approving the initial license. new text end new text begin (c) A teacher who has not completed dyslexia training under this subdivision and is renewing a license must complete the training within one year of license renewal. A teacher must complete this training one time only to satisfy the requirement, either during initial licensure or once upon license renewal. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment, and applies to licenses issued or renewed on or after July 1, 2027. new text end